src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
!! !!!Tags for numerals (number words)

!! !!Basic tags
LEXICON numtag
+Det+Qnt+Pl: # ;

LEXICON numtagsg
+Det+Qnt+Sg: # ;


!! !!Tags for special use

!! !Date
LEXICON datetag
 +Det+Qnt+Sem/Date+Sg:  # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot_tag
 +Det+Qnt+Sem/Date+Sg:  MARKDOT ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_fullsuff_tag
 +Det+Qnt+Sem/Date+Sg:   # ;

!! !Clock
LEXICON numclock
 +Det+Qnt+Sem/Time-clock+Sg: # ; !foreløpig

LEXICON NUM-ARABICCASES
+Det+Qnt+Sg:   # ;

LEXICON ID-ARABIC
+Det+Sem/ID:   # ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +A+Ord: MARKDOT ;

LEXICON ACASETAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  is for 1e+Det+Qnt+Sg+Det+Qnt:1e
+Det+Qnt+Sg: # ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPCOLL   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ collectives
  ARABICDELIMITER ;
 

LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer?
 +Det+Qnt+Sg:            #      ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA

LEXICON ROMNUMTAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
  +Det+Qnt+Rom+Use/Circ:  #            ;
  +A+Rom+Ord+Use/Circ:%.  #            ; ! !III. as ordinal.

LEXICON yeartag
 +Det+Qnt+Sem/Year+Sg: # ;

LEXICON yeartagpl
 +Det+Qnt+Sem/Year+Pl: # ;

LEXICON NUMTAG
+Det+Qnt:  # ;

LEXICON RNum
      +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-∑# NounRoot ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num

LEXICON PROSENT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ % and case suffix
                    POSTPROSENT ; ! case suffix
 % %%+Err/MissingSpace:%%   POSTPROSENT ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".
          % %%:% %% POSTPROSENT ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.
 % %%+Err/MissingSpace:%%   POSTPROSENT ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".

LEXICON POSTPROSENT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ % and case suffix
< "@R.ErrOrth.ON@" "+Err/Orth":0 "@C.ErrOrth@" > ARABICDELIMITER ;
   @D.ErrOrth.ON@@C.ErrOrth@                     ARABICDELIMITER ;



!LEXICON ARABICCASEphone  
! +Det+Qnt+Sem/Phonenr+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Det+Qnt+Sem/Phonenr+Sg+Acc: # ;
